Hawaii statutes.
§88-230 Studies and reports. The state
agency shall make studies concerning the problem of old age and survivors
insurance protection for employees of the State and local governments and
instrumentalities and concerning the operation of agreements made and plans
approved under this part and shall submit a report to the legislature at the
beginning of each regular session, covering the administration and operation of
this part during the preceding fiscal period, including such recommendations
for amendments to this part as it considers proper. [L 1953, c 217, §9; RL
1955, §6-206; am L Sp 1959 1st, c 13, §2; HRS §88-230]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next